Vermont statutes. Title 23 Motor Vehicles
Article 6. Trailer Coaches

§ 1341.
Trailer coaches—Safety chain.

In addition to a hitch, trailer coaches shall be secured to the towing vehicle, while in operation on any highway, by a safety chain.
The hitch on any motor vehicle towing a trailer coach and the corresponding coupling on such coach and such safety chain shall be adequate to ensure the public safety.

§ 1342.
Fire extinguisher.

There shall be carried on each trailer coach at least one fire extinguisher of a type approved by the State Fire Marshal, in good usable condition and easily accessible.
The extinguisher shall be of not less than five pounds capacity, if it is of a CO2 type, and not less than two and one-half pounds capacity, if it is of a dry chemical type.

HISTORY:

Amended

1969, No. 38

.

§ 1343.
Repealed.
1971, No. 228 (Adj. Sess.), § 32.

§ 1344.
Riding in trailer coaches.

No person may occupy a trailer coach while it is being moved upon a public highway.

HISTORY:

Added

1969, No. 31

, § 2.